tables/sw-ke-g2.ctb
# liblouis: Swahili (Kenya) (Grade 2)
#
#+locale:sw
#+type:literary
#+grade:2
#
#  This file is part of liblouis.
#
#  liblouis is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify it
#  under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as
#  published by the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the
#  License, or (at your option) any later version.
#
#  liblouis is distributed in the hope that it will be useful, but
#  WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
#  MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE. See the GNU
#  Lesser General Public License for more details.
#
#  You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public
#  License along with liblouis. If not, see
#  <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.
#

space \x00a0 a
include spaces.uti

# Character definitions
include latinLetterDef6Dots.uti
include digits6Dots.uti
include litdigits6Dots.uti

sign © 45-14

# Braille indicators
numsign 3456
# letsign 56
capsletter 6
begcapsword 6-6



# Punctuation Definitions
punctuation , 2
punctuation ' 3
punctuation ; 23
punctuation : 25
punctuation . 256
punctuation ? 236
punctuation ! 235
punctuation " 5
punctuation “ 236
punctuation ” 356
punctuation ‘ 6-236
punctuation ’ 356-3
punctuation ( 2356
punctuation ) 2356
punctuation [ 6-2356
punctuation ] 2356-3
punctuation - 36
punctuation – 36-36
punctuation — 36-36


# Punctuation in context
always . 256
always , 2
midnum : 3456
always : 25
midnum - 36
always ; 23
postpunc ” 356
prepunc “ 236
noback always ( 2356
prepunc ( 2356
postpunc ) 2356
begword ( 2356
endword ) 2356



# Contractions
always aa 345
always ch 16
always dh 2346
always ee 26
always end 12346
always gh 126
always ii 35
always kw 12345
always mb 1346
always mw 123456
always nd 1246
always ng 346
always ny 12456
always nz 23456
always oo 246
always sh 146
always st 34
always sw 12356
always th 1456
always tw 156
always uu 1256

# dot 5 signs
always jiji 5-245
always mimi 5-134
always ninyi 5-1345
always sisi 5-234

# dots 456 signs
always baba 456-12
always dada 456-145
always kaka 456-13
always mama 456-134
always sema 456-234
always wewe 456-2456
always yeye 456-13456

# Shortforms
word afadhali 1-124-145
word amani 1-134
word anwani 1-1345
word badala 12-145-123
word baadaye 12-145-13456
word basi 12-234
word bila 12-123
word chakula 16-13-123
word chini 16-1345
word elimu 15-123
word eneo 15-1345
word fedha 124-2346
word gani 1245-1345
word habari 125-12-1235
word haraka 125-1235-13
word ingawa 24-346
word ishara 24-146
word isipokuwa 24-234-1234
word jeshi 245-146
word kabisa 13-12-234
word kama 13-134
word katika 13-2345-13
word kila 13-123
word kuliko 13-123-13
word labda 123-12-145
word lakini 123-13-1345
word lugha 123-126
word maisha 134-146
word nafasi 1345-124-234
word namna 1345-134-1345
word nini 1345-1345
word pamoja 1234-134-245
word pasipo 1234-234-1234
word sababu 234-12
word sasa 234-234
word sehemu 234-125-134
word sawasawa 234-2456-234
word salamu 234-123-134
word tayari 2345-13456-1235
word tena 2345-1345
word thamani 1456-134-1345
word vema 1236-134
word vile 1236-123
word vizuri 1236-1356-1235
word wala 2456-123
word wazi 2456-1356
word waziwazi 2456-1356-2456
word yaani 13456-1345
word zaidi 1356-145


include braille-patterns.cti
